Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE E. THE TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM

CHAPTER 96. INSTITUTIONS OF THE TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. SUL ROSS STATE UNIVERSITY

Sec. 96.01. SUL ROSS STATE UNIVERSITY. Sul Ross State University is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the city of Alpine, with an upper-level educational center known as Sul Ross State University Rio Grande College operated in the cities of Del Rio, Eagle Pass, and Uvalde. The university is under the management and control of the Board of Regents, Texas State University System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3222, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1160, ch. 434, Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 1975; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 2, eff. May 17, 1995.

Sec. 96.02. REFERENCE TO UVALDE STUDY CENTER. A reference in law to the Uvalde Study Center of Sul Ross State University means Sul Ross State University Rio Grande College.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 3, eff. May 17, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER C. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY

Sec. 96.41. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY. Texas State University is a coeducational institution of higher education with campuses located in the city of San Marcos and in the city of Round Rock. The university is under the management and control of the Board of Regents, Texas State University System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3223, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1160, ch. 434, Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 1975; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (S.B. 974), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER D. SAM HOUSTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Sec. 96.61. SAM HOUSTON STATE UNIVERSITY. (a) Sam Houston State University is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the city of Huntsville. It is under the management and control of the Board of Regents, Texas State University System.

(b) The board may not change the name of the university.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3223, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1160, ch. 434, Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 675 (H.B. 1418), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 96.62. UNIVERSITY AIRPORT. (a) The board may construct or otherwise acquire without cost to the state or the university an airport for purposes of cooperation with the national defense program and for instruction in aeronautics.

(b) The board may acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or by any other means, and may maintain, use, and operate any and all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest in property, necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers conferred by this section. The board has the power of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring by condemnation any real property, or any interest in real property, necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers conferred by this section. The board shall exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by general law, including Title 52, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas, 1925, except that it shall not be required to give bond for appeal or bond for costs.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3223, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 96.63. JOSEY SCHOOL OF VOCATIONAL EDUCATION. (a) The Josey School of Vocational Education is a division of Sam Houston State University and is under the direction and control of the Board of Regents, State Senior Colleges.

(b) The administration of the school is under the direction of the president of Sam Houston State University.

(c) The school shall provide vocational training for individuals over the age of 18 who cannot qualify scholastically for college entrance and for other persons who desire to avail themselves of short intensive courses in vocational education in the following fields: agriculture, home management, distributive education, photography, plumbing, sheet metal work, machine shop, auto mechanics, furniture, electrical appliances, air conditioning and refrigeration, printing, radio, garment making, interior decorating, light construction contracting, photoengraving, watchmaking, and other trades of like nature. The training in these subjects shall be organized so that the courses may be completed in from 9 to 24 months. Courses may also be offered in English and mathematics and other subjects which will contribute to the vocational training of the student. Vocational courses in government, designed to prepare workers in various county, city, and state offices, may also be offered.

(d) The rate of tuition charged students shall be the actual cost of teaching service, not to exceed $500 per scholastic year of nine months. Scholarships may be awarded by the board to worthy indigent students who might greatly benefit from the training offered. The amount of the scholarships may vary according to the needs of the individuals, but in no case may it reduce the tuition payment by the student to a point less than the tuition fee regularly charged students at the state senior colleges.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3224, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 96.64. BILL BLACKWOOD LAW ENFORCEMENT MANAGEMENT INSTITUTE OF TEXAS. (a) The Bill Blackwood Law Enforcement Management Institute of Texas is created for the training of police management personnel. The headquarters of the institute are at Sam Houston State University. The institute is under the supervision and direction of the president of Sam Houston State University and shall be operated and managed as a joint program between Sam Houston State University, Texas A&M University, and Texas Woman's University.

(b) The president may establish rules relating to the institute.

(c) The president shall establish reasonable charges for participation in institute training programs by participants who are not residents of this state. The participation costs of participants who are residents, including tuition, books, room, board, and travel costs, shall be paid from the Bill Blackwood Law Enforcement Management Institute of Texas fund. Participation in the institute training programs is open to every eligible resident of this state, whether or not the person is sponsored by an employing law enforcement agency.

(d) The Bill Blackwood Law Enforcement Management Institute of Texas fund is in the state treasury. The president shall use the fund in administering the institute.

(e) The board of regents of the Texas State University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the institute to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with Subchapter B, Chapter 55. The board of regents may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds a portion of the proceeds of the Bill Blackwood Law Enforcement Management Institute of Texas fund. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 4, Sec. 2.39(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 19, Sec. 1, eff. April 11, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 26, eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Renumbered from Government Code, Sec. 415.091 to 415.099 and amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1047, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 876, Sec. 1.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 895, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 96.641. INITIAL TRAINING AND CONTINUING EDUCATION FOR POLICE CHIEFS AND COMMAND STAFF. (a) The Bill Blackwood Law Enforcement Management Institute of Texas shall establish and offer a program of initial training and a program of continuing education for police chiefs. The curriculum for each program must relate to law enforcement management issues. The institute shall develop the curriculum for the programs. The curriculum must be approved by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(a-1) The institute may establish and offer a continuing education program for command staff for individuals who are second in command to police chiefs. The command staff continuing education program must satisfy the requirements for the police chief continuing education program under Subsection (a).

(b) Each police chief must receive at least 40 hours of continuing education provided by the institute under this section each 24-month period. The Texas Commission on Law Enforcement by rule shall establish a uniform 24-month continuing education training period.

(c) An individual appointed or elected to that individual's first position as chief must receive not fewer than 80 hours of initial training for new chiefs in accordance with Subsections (d) and (e).

(d) A newly appointed or elected police chief shall complete the initial training program for new chiefs not later than the second anniversary of that individual's appointment or election as chief. The initial training program for new chiefs is in addition to the initial training and continuing education required by Chapter 1701, Occupations Code. The Texas Commission on Law Enforcement by rule shall establish that the first continuing education training period for an individual under Subsection (b) begins on the first day of the first uniform continuing education training period that follows the date the individual completed the initial training program.

(e) The institute by rule may provide for the waiver of:

(1) the requirement of all or part of the 80 hours of initial training for new chiefs to the extent the new chief has satisfactorily completed equivalent training in the 24 months preceding the individual's appointment or election; or

(2) the continuing education requirements of Subsection (b) for an individual who has satisfactorily completed equivalent continuing education in the preceding 24 months.

(f) An individual who is subject to the continuing education requirements of Subsection (b) is exempt from other continuing education requirements under Subchapter H, Chapter 1701, Occupations Code.

(g) In this section, "police chief" or "chief" means the head of a police department.

(h) The chief of a municipal police department must be licensed as a peace officer by the commission no later than one year after the date that the chief is appointed to the position of police chief. The commission shall establish requirements for licensing and for revocation, suspension, cancellation, or denial of peace officer license for a police chief.

(i) A police chief who does not comply with this section cannot continue to be the chief.

(j) As part of the initial training and continuing education for police chiefs required under this section, the institute shall establish a program on asset forfeiture under Chapter 59, Code of Criminal Procedure. The program must include an examination of the best practices for educating peace officers about asset forfeiture and monitoring peace officers' compliance with laws relating to asset forfeiture.

(k) As part of the initial training and continuing education for police chiefs required under this section, the institute shall establish a program on racial profiling. The program must include an examination of the best practices for:

(1) monitoring peace officers' compliance with laws and internal agency policies relating to racial profiling;

(2) implementing laws and internal agency policies relating to preventing racial profiling; and

(3) analyzing and reporting collected information.

(l) As part of the initial training and continuing education for police chiefs required under this section, the institute shall establish a program on de-escalation and crisis intervention techniques to facilitate interaction with persons with mental impairments. The program must include an examination of the best practices for:

(1) monitoring peace officers' compliance with internal agency policies relating to de-escalation and crisis intervention techniques to facilitate interaction with persons with mental impairments; and

(2) implementing internal agency policies relating to those techniques.

(m) A police chief may not satisfy the requirements of Subsection (l) by taking an online course on de-escalation and crisis intervention techniques to facilitate interaction with persons with mental impairments.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 770, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 929, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.740, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(47), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 393 (S.B. 1473), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 278 (H.B. 486), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 602 (S.B. 244), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 602 (S.B. 244), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.16, eff. May 18, 2013.

Sec. 96.645. CORRECTIONAL MANAGEMENT INSTITUTE OF TEXAS. (a) In this section, "institute" means the Correctional Management Institute of Texas.

(b) The Correctional Management Institute of Texas is established for the training of criminal justice professionals. The headquarters of the institute are at Sam Houston State University. The institute is under the supervision and direction of the president of Sam Houston State University.

(c) The president of Sam Houston State University may establish rules relating to the institute.

(d) The president of Sam Houston State University shall establish reasonable charges for participation in institute training programs by participants who are not residents of this state. The participation costs of participants who are residents of this state, including tuition, books, room, board, and travel costs, shall be paid from the Correctional Management Institute of Texas and Criminal Justice Center Account in the general revenue fund.

(e) The institute may provide fee-based training and professional development programming using funds other than appropriated funds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 614 (S.B. 1313), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 96.65. CRIME VICTIMS' INSTITUTE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Close relative of a deceased victim" has the meaning assigned by Article 56A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(2) "Guardian of a victim" has the meaning assigned by Article 56A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(3) "Institute" means the Crime Victims' Institute.

(4) "Victim" has the meaning assigned by Article 56A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature to create an institute to:

(1) compile and study information concerning the impact of crime on:

(A) victims;

(B) close relatives of deceased victims;

(C) guardians of victims; and

(D) society;

(2) use information compiled by the institute to evaluate the effectiveness of criminal justice policy and juvenile justice policy in preventing the victimization of society by crime;

(3) develop policies to assist the criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system in preventing the victimization of society by crime; and

(4) provide information related to the studies of the institute.

(c) The headquarters of the institute are at Sam Houston State University in Huntsville, Texas. The institute is under the supervision and direction of the president of Sam Houston State University.

(d) The institute shall:

(1) conduct an in-depth analysis of the impact of crime on:

(A) victims;

(B) close relatives of deceased victims;

(C) guardians of victims; and

(D) society;

(2) evaluate the effectiveness of and deficiencies in the criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system in addressing the needs of victims, close relatives of deceased victims, and guardians of victims and recommend strategies to address the deficiencies of each system;

(3) determine the long-range needs of victims, close relatives of deceased victims, and guardians of victims as the needs relate to the criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system and recommend changes for each system;

(4) assess the cost-effectiveness of existing policies and programs in the criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system relating to victims, close relatives of deceased victims, and guardians of victims;

(5) make general recommendations for improving the service delivery systems for victims in the State of Texas;

(6) advise and assist the legislature in developing plans, programs, and legislation for improving the effectiveness of the criminal justice system and juvenile justice system in addressing the needs of victims, close relatives of deceased victims, and guardians of victims;

(7) make computations of daily costs and compare interagency costs on victims' services provided by agencies that are a part of the criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system;

(8) determine the costs to attorneys representing the state of performing statutory and constitutional duties relating to victims, close relatives of deceased victims, or guardians of victims;

(9) make statistical computations for use in planning for the long-range needs of the criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system as those needs relate to victims, close relatives of deceased victims, and guardians of victims;

(10) determine the long-range information needs of the criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system as those needs relate to victims, close relatives of deceased victims, and guardians of victims;

(11) enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Texas Crime Victim Clearinghouse to provide training and education related to the outcome of research and duties as conducted under Subdivisions (1)-(10);

(12) issue periodic reports to the attorney general and the legislature on the progress toward accomplishing the duties of the institute; and

(13) engage in other research activities consistent with the duties of the institute.

(e) The institute shall cooperate with the Criminal Justice Policy Council in performing the duties of the institute.

(f) The institute may enter into memoranda of understanding with state agencies in performing the duties of the institute.

(g) Local law enforcement agencies shall cooperate with the institute by providing to the institute access to information that is necessary for the performance of the duties of the institute.

(h) The president of Sam Houston State University may employ personnel as necessary to perform the duties of the institute.

(i) The institute may contract with public or private entities in the performance of the duties of the institute.

(j) The institute may accept gifts, grants, donations, or matching funds from a public or private source for the performance of the duties of the institute. The legislature may appropriate money to the institute to finance the performance of the duties of the institute. Money and appropriations received by the institute under this subsection shall be deposited as provided by Section 96.652.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Redesignated and amended from Government Code Sec. 412.001, 412.002, 412.011 to 412.016 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.23, eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 96.651. CRIME VICTIMS' INSTITUTE ADVISORY COUNCIL. (a) In this section:

(1) "Advisory council" means the Crime Victims' Institute Advisory Council.

(2) "Victim" has the meaning assigned by Article 56A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) The Crime Victims' Institute Advisory Council is created as an advisory council to the Crime Victims' Institute.

(c) The advisory council is composed of the attorney general and the following individuals, each of whom is appointed by the governor:

(1) a victim;

(2) a member of the house of representatives;

(3) a member of the senate;

(4) a county judge or district judge whose primary responsibility is to preside over criminal cases;

(5) a district attorney, criminal district attorney, county attorney who prosecutes felony offenses, or county attorney who prosecutes mostly criminal cases;

(6) a law enforcement officer;

(7) a crime victims' assistance coordinator;

(8) a crime victims' liaison;

(9) a mental health professional with substantial experience in the care and treatment of victims;

(10) a person with broad knowledge of sexual assault issues;

(11) a person with broad knowledge of domestic violence issues;

(12) a person with broad knowledge of child abuse issues;

(13) a person with broad knowledge of issues relating to the intoxication offenses described by Chapter 49, Penal Code;

(14) a person with broad knowledge of homicide issues;

(15) a person with broad knowledge of research methods; and

(16) a designee of the governor.

(d) The advisory council shall select a presiding officer from among the council members and other officers that the council considers necessary.

(e) The advisory council shall meet at the call of the presiding officer.

(f) Appointed members of the advisory council serve for staggered two-year terms, with the terms of eight of the members expiring on January 31 of each even-numbered year and the terms of eight members expiring on January 31 of each odd-numbered year.

(g) Service on the advisory council by a public officer or employee is an additional duty of the office or employment.

(h) A member of the advisory council serves without compensation for service on the council but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred while performing council duties.

(i) The advisory council may establish advisory task forces or committees that the council considers necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section and Sections 96.65 and 96.652.

(j) The advisory council shall advise the Crime Victims' Institute on issues relating directly to the duties of the institute as set forth under Section 96.65(d).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Redesignated and amended from Government Code Sec. 412.051 to 412.057 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.24, eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 96.652. CRIME VICTIMS' INSTITUTE ACCOUNT; AUDIT; REPORT. (a) The Crime Victims' Institute account is an account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The Crime Victims' Institute may use funds from the Crime Victims' Institute account to carry out the purposes of this section and Sections 96.65 and 96.651.

(c) The comptroller shall deposit the funds received under Section 96.65 to the credit of the Crime Victims' Institute account.

(d) Funds spent are subject to audit by the state auditor.

(e) The Crime Victims' Institute shall prepare a complete annual financial report as prescribed by Section 2101.011, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 485, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Redesignated and amended from Government Code Sec. 412.081, 412.082 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 96.66. SAM HOUSTON STATE UNIVERSITY COLLEGE OF OSTEOPATHIC MEDICINE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of the Texas State University System.

(2) "College" means the Sam Houston State University College of Osteopathic Medicine established under this section.

(3) "University" means Sam Houston State University.

(b) The Sam Houston State University College of Osteopathic Medicine is a college of the university and is under the management and control of the board with degrees offered under the name and authority of the university.

(c) The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees and may adopt rules for the operation, control, and management of the college as necessary for conducting a college of osteopathic medicine of the first class.

(d) The provost of the university, on behalf of the board, may execute and carry out an affiliation or coordinating agreement with any other entity or institution.

(e) The board may solicit, accept, and administer gifts and grants from any public or private source for the use and benefit of the college.

(f) In addition to the college's facilities, the board may enter into agreements under which additional facilities used in the college's teaching and research programs, including libraries, auditoriums, research facilities, and medical education buildings, may be provided by a public or private entity.

(g) A teaching hospital considered suitable by the board may be provided by a public or private entity. The hospital may not be constructed, maintained, or operated with state funds.

(h) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 1563), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2023.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 294 (H.B. 2867), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 1563), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER E. LAMAR UNIVERSITY AND RELATED INSTITUTIONS

Sec. 96.701. LAMAR UNIVERSITY. Lamar University is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the city of Beaumont. The university is under the management and control of the board of regents, Texas State University System.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1061, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 96.702. SPINDLETOP MEMORIAL MUSEUM. The board may create the Spindletop Memorial Museum at Lamar University and may administer the museum as the board considers appropriate.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1061, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 96.703. LAMAR INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY. (a) In the city of Beaumont, the board shall establish and maintain a lower-division institution of higher education as a separate degree-granting institution to be known as Lamar Institute of Technology.

(b) The primary purpose of the institute is to teach technical and vocational courses and related supporting courses. The board may confer degrees appropriate to the institute's curriculum.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 287, Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1061, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 767, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1212, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 287 (H.B. 51), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 287 (H.B. 51), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 96.704. LAMAR STATE COLLEGE--PORT ARTHUR AND LAMAR STATE COLLEGE--ORANGE. (a) The board shall establish and maintain coeducational lower-division institutions of higher education as separate accredited degree-granting institutions in the counties of Jefferson and Orange, to be known as Lamar State College-- Port Arthur and Lamar State College-- Orange, to teach only freshman- and sophomore-level courses.

(b) The board may acquire, construct, or otherwise make provision for adequate physical facilities for use by Lamar State College-- Port Arthur and Lamar State College-- Orange and may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to the board, grants or gifts of money or property tendered by any reason for the use and benefit of the school.

(c) The board with approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees. The board may make other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of Lamar State College-- Port Arthur and Lamar State College-- Orange as are necessary for each institution to be a first-class institution for freshman and sophomore students.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the powers of the board as conferred by law.

(e) For Lamar State College-- Port Arthur and Lamar State College-- Orange, the board may expend funds allocated to Lamar University under Chapter 62 for any of the purposes listed in Section 17, Article VII, Texas Constitution, in the same manner and under the same circumstances as expenditures for those purposes for other separate degree-granting institutions.

(f) A reference in state law to Lamar University at Port Arthur means Lamar State College--Port Arthur. A reference in state law to Lamar University at Orange means Lamar State College--Orange.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1061, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 767, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 96.705. APPLICATION OF OTHER LAW. All other provisions of law, including provisions for student fees, applicable to institutions of the Texas State University System apply to Lamar University and its educational centers.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1061, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 96.706. HAZARDOUS WASTE RESEARCH CENTER. (a) The Hazardous Waste Research Center is established at Lamar University at Beaumont. The center is under the authority of the board of regents of the Texas State University System. The center may employ such personnel as are necessary.

(b) The center shall carry out a program of research, evaluation, testing, development, and demonstration of alternative or innovative technologies that may be used in minimization, destruction, or handling of hazardous wastes to achieve better protection of human health and the environment.

(c) The center shall provide coordination of the activities of a consortium of Texas universities initially consisting of the Texas Engineering Experiment Station of The Texas A&M University System, the University of Houston, The University of Texas at Austin, and Lamar University at Beaumont, and other entities that may become affiliated.

(d) The center shall develop and maintain a database relevant to the programs of the center.

(e) The programs of the center may include:

(1) primary and secondary research;

(2) collection, analysis, and dissemination of information;

(3) the development of public policy recommendations;

(4) training related to the handling and management of hazardous waste;

(5) evaluation of technologies for the treatment and disposal of hazardous wastes;

(6) demonstration projects and pilot studies of processing, storage, and destruction technologies; and

(7) other services consistent with the purposes of the program.

(f) In carrying out its established programs, the center may enter into agreements with:

(1) the members of the Texas Consortium;

(2) other universities in Texas, Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, and other states;

(3) private research organizations; and

(4) industry.

(g) A policy board is created to determine the policies for program research, evaluation, testing, development, demonstration, intellectual property rights, and peer review. The policy board consists of each member of the consortium. The governing board of each institution of higher education belonging to the consortium shall appoint an individual to serve as a member of the policy board.

(h) The institutions of higher education that are members of the policy board shall appoint an advisory council to develop recommendations on the priorities for research and to serve as a resource group on the projects. Each institution shall appoint two members from private industry and two other members to serve for terms to be set by the policy board.

(i) The center shall seek grant and contract support from federal and other sources to the extent possible and accept gifts and donations to support its purposes and programs.

(j) The center may receive state-appropriated funds as considered appropriate by the legislature.

(k) Disbursement of funds received by the center on behalf of the consortium shall be on an equitable basis and in accordance with policy determined by the policy board subject to laws of the state and policies of member institutions. Disbursement policy shall recognize the need for core program support at each consortium institution, matching requirements for federal grants and contracts, general administration, and new initiatives. Disbursement of funds received in response to specific proposals shall be in accordance with those proposals.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1061, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 96.707. TEXAS ACADEMY OF LEADERSHIP IN THE HUMANITIES. (a) The Texas Academy of Leadership in the Humanities is established as a two-year program at Lamar University at Beaumont for secondary school students selected under this section. The academy is under the management and control of the board of regents of the Texas State University System.

(b) The goals of the academy are to:

(1) provide gifted and talented secondary school students with accelerated academic experiences to ensure success as undergraduates with advanced standing;

(2) encourage those students to develop their full leadership potential and their ethical decision-making capabilities;

(3) provide those students with academic and social role models and mentors to motivate them to pursue academic excellence and self-direction;

(4) provide a model setting for the training of teachers in the educational materials and methods appropriate for gifted learners;

(5) encourage the cooperation of business leaders and Lamar University staff to provide practical settings and experiences for those students through independent study, shadowing, and mentorship;

(6) establish a setting to support necessary research to determine the academy's effectiveness and to disseminate results of that research; and

(7) promote the active involvement of parents in all educational programs of the academy.

(c) To be eligible for admission to the academy, a student must:

(1) complete and file with the board, on a form prescribed by the board, an application for admission and a written essay on a topic selected by the board;

(2) have successfully completed 10th grade in school;

(3) be nominated by a teacher, school administrator, parent, community leader, or another secondary school student;

(4) submit to the board two written recommendations from teachers;

(5) have a composite score on an assessment test that is equal to or greater than the equivalent of 1,000 on the Scholastic Aptitude Test;

(6) have a language score on an assessment test that is equal to or greater than the equivalent of 550 on the Scholastic Aptitude Test; and

(7) have complied with any other requirements adopted by the board under this subchapter.

(d) The board shall recruit minority secondary school students to apply for admission to the academy.

(e) The board shall select for admission to the academy eligible students based on additional testing required by the board and on a personal interview by a selection committee appointed by the board. If the board selects an eligible student for admission to the academy, the board shall send written notice to the student and the student's school district.

(f) The board shall establish a tuition and fee scholarship for each student who enrolls in the academy. A student who enrolls in the academy is responsible for room, board, and book costs and must live in a residence determined by board rule.

(g) The academy courses are taught by the faculty members of Lamar University. The board may employ additional staff for the academy.

(h) The board shall provide each student enrolled in the academy with a mentor who is a faculty member at Lamar University to assist the student in completing the student's course of study in the academy.

(i) A student of the academy may attend a college course offered by Lamar University and receive college credit for that course.

(j) The board may accept gifts and grants from a public or private source for the academy.

(k) For each student enrolled in the academy, the academy is entitled to allotments from the Foundation School Program under Chapter 48 as if the academy were a school district without a tier one local share for purposes of Section 48.266.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1061, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1071, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 695 (H.B. 771), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.070, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 96.708. LAMAR UNIVERSITY CENTER FOR EXCELLENCE IN DEAF STUDIES AND DEAF EDUCATION. (a) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of the Texas State University System.

(2) "Center" means the Lamar University Center for Excellence in Deaf Studies and Deaf Education.

(b) The board shall establish the Lamar University Center for Excellence in Deaf Studies and Deaf Education for the purposes of advancing deaf education programs in Texas by:

(1) collaborating with the Department of Assistive and Rehabilitative Services and the Texas School for the Deaf to assess deaf education needs in this state and strategies to address those needs;

(2) studying bilingual education programs for the deaf;

(3) studying improved teacher training; and

(4) studying the incorporation of technology into deaf education.

(c) The center shall develop a strategic plan to guide and evaluate the center's progress toward achieving the purposes of the center in accordance with this section. The strategic plan must:

(1) describe the goals, objectives, and performance standards for each of the center's programs and how those programs help the center to achieve its purposes;

(2) assess the needs of the center's programs and faculty; and

(3) assess the center's need for new initiatives.

(d) The organization, control, and management of the center are vested in the board.

(e) The board shall select a location for the center at Lamar University.

(f) The board may solicit, accept, and administer gifts and grants from any public or private source for the use and benefit of the center.

(g) The board may use any available funds, including legislative appropriations made to Lamar University for instruction, operations, or infrastructure support, federal funds, or gifts or grants to establish or operate the center.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1009 (H.B. 868), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.